Utah statutes.
17C-2-504.   Additional requirements for notice of a plan hearing.

Each notice under Section 17C-2-502 of a plan hearing shall include:

(1)  a statement that any person objecting to the draft project area plan or contesting the regularity of any of the proceedings to adopt it may appear before the agency board at the hearing to show cause why the draft project area plan should not be adopted; and

(2)  a statement that the proposed project area plan is available for inspection at the agency offices.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 359, 2006 General Session

